Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
PART 1 Conventional Quia Timet

23-3-40.
Purpose of quia timet.

The proceeding quia timet is sustained in equity for the purpose of causing to be delivered and canceled any instrument which has answered the object of its creation or any forged or other iniquitous deed or other writing which, though not enforced at the time, either casts a cloud over the complainant’s title or otherwise subjects him to future liability or present annoyance, and the cancellation of which is necessary to his perfect protection.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3153; Code 1868, § 3165; Code 1873, § 3232; Code 1882, § 3232; Civil Code 1895, § 4892; Civil Code 1910, § 5465; Code 1933, § 37-1407.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the problems associated with acquiring good title, see 15 Ga. B.J. 281 (1953).

For article, “Tracing Georgia’s English Common Law Equity Jurisprudential Roots: Quia Timet,” see 14 The Journal of Southern Legal History 135 (2006).

For annual survey on local government law, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 199 (2016).

For annual survey on real property, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 241 (2019).

23-3-41.
When relief granted; costs.

In all proceedings quia timet or proceedings to remove clouds upon titles to real estate, if a proper case is made, the relief sought shall be granted to any complainant irrespective of whether the invalidity of the instrument sought to be canceled appears upon the face of the instrument or whether the invalidity appears or arises solely from facts outside of the instrument.

In such cases the costs shall be taxed against the litigants in the discretion of the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1905, p. 102, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5466, 5467; Code 1933, §§ 37-1408, 37-1409.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the problems with acquiring good title, see 15 Ga. B.J. 281 (1953).

23-3-42.
Cloud on title; what constitutes; when removable.

An instrument which, by itself or in connection with proof of possession by a former occupant or other extrinsic facts, gives the claimant thereunder an apparent right in or to the property may constitute a cloud on the title of the true owner; and the latter may proceed to have the same removed upon proof:

That he cannot immediately or effectually maintain or protect his rights by any other course of proceeding open to him;

That the instrument sought to be canceled is such as would operate to throw a cloud or suspicion upon his title and might be vexatiously or injuriously used against him;

That he either suffers some present injury by reason of the hostile claim of right or, though the claim has not been asserted adversely or aggressively, he has reason to apprehend that the evidence upon which he relies to impeach or invalidate the same as a claim upon his title may be lost or impaired by lapse of time.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 4893; Civil Code 1910, § 5468; Code 1933, § 37-1410.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the problems with acquiring good title, see 15 Ga. B.J. 281 (1953).

23-3-43.
Special master.

At the option of the complainant as prayed for in the complaint, the court, upon receipt of the complaint, shall submit the same to a special master as provided for in Code Sections 23-3-63 through 23-3-68, except that as in other equity cases there shall be no right to a jury trial.

History.

Code 1981, §

23-3-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1408, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “The New Special Master Rule — Uniform Superior Court Rule 46: Life Jackets for the Courts in the Perfect Storm,”
see 15 (No. 4) Ga. St. B.J. 20 (2009).

For annual survey on real property, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (2013).

23-3-44.
Redemption and notice.

Proceedings quia timet may be used to remove clouds on title caused by equities of redemption following tax sales; provided, however, that the length of time for redemption shall remain as provided by law and nothing in this Code section shall preclude the necessity of giving all parties at interest notice of this proceeding.

History.

Code 1981, §

23-3-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1408, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 23; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 23.